Utah statutes.
17C-4-101.   Resolution authorizing the preparation of a community development draft project area plan -- Request to adopt resolution.

(1)  An agency board may begin the process of adopting a community development project area plan by adopting a resolution that authorizes the preparation of a draft community development project area plan.

(2) (a)  Any person or any group, association, corporation, or other entity may submit a written request to the board to adopt a resolution under Subsection (1).

(b)  A request under Subsection (2)(a) may include plans showing the community development proposed for an area within the agency's boundaries.

(c)  The board may, in its sole discretion, grant or deny a request under Subsection (2)(a).

